Utah statutes.
13-1-1.   Legislative findings and declarations.
The Legislature finds that many businesses and occupations in the state have a
pronounced physical and economic impact on the health, safety, and welfare of
the citizens of the state. The Legislature further finds that while the
overall impact is generally beneficial to the public, the potential for harm
and injury frequently warrants intervention by state government.
The Legislature declares that it is appropriate and necessary for state
government to protect its citizens from harmful and injurious acts by persons
offering or providing essential or necessary goods and services to the general
public. The Legislature further declares that business regulation should not
be unfairly discriminatory. However, the general public interest must be
recognized and regarded as the primary purpose of all regulation by state
government.
